Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB459.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chief Joseph J. Montgomery, Jr. Memorial Highway.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Joseph J. Montgomery, Jr., was raised in Gradyville, and graduated from Penncrest High School in 1987.(2) As a young man, Mr. Montgomery discovered the importance of being an active participant in one's community as a Boy Scout of America where he earned membership to the Order of the Arrow, an honor reserved for those that most exemplify the value of the Boy Scouts.12345678910111213141516171819 (3) Mr. Montgomery committed himself to the service of his community as a lifetime member of the Edgmont and Rocky Run Fire Companies, as part of the Delaware County Park Police and as a paramedic for Main Line Health EMS for 30 years.(4) Mr. Montgomery also owned and operated his own business, Pro Rescue, which allowed him to use his knowledge and lifesaving skills to educate and train others in the community in CPR and first aid readiness.(5) Mr. Montgomery was also a member of the Concord Masonic Lodge #625.(6) After a life dedicated to the service of others, Mr. Montgomery sadly passed away on September 29, 2023, at 54 years of age.(b) Designation.--The section of Pennsylvania Route 352, also known as Middletown Road, from the intersection with State Route 4008, also known as Gradyville Road, in Edgmont Township, Delaware County, to the intersection with Pennsylvania Route 452, also known as North Pennell Road, in Middletown Township, Delaware County, is designated the Chief Joseph J. Montgomery, Jr. Memorial Highway.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the highway to traffic in both directions on the highway.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0459PN0443 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526